California statutes. Public Resources Code
The director may enter into an agreement with the owner or any other person who has legal control of any property, any public agency with regulatory or natural resource management authority over any property that is included within any wildland, or any nonprofit organization to conduct joint prescribed burning operations that serve the public interest and are beneficial to the state. The agreement shall establish guidelines for the cooperative management of joint prescribed burning operations and shall require the completion of a project agreement for each prescribed burn, which shall include all of the following:

(a) A list of all participants.

(b) A joint prescribed burn plan.

(c) A display of the project costs to be assumed by each participant.

(d) A summary of the benefits to be received by each participant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   (AB 2551)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.2.

To be considered for the public interest and beneficial to the state, each prescribed burn, pursuant to Section 4497, shall be for any of the following purposes or any combination of the following purposes:

(a) Prevention of high-intensity wildland fires through reduction of the volume and continuity of wildland fuels.

(b) Watershed management.

(c) Range improvement.

(d) Vegetation management.

(e) Forest improvement.

(f) Wildlife habitat
 improvement.

(g) Air quality maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   (AB 2551)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.4. Prescribed Fire Liability Pilot Program [4500. - 4503.]

4500.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Burn boss” means either of the following:

(A) A person certified pursuant to Section 4477 to conduct prescribed burning operations and to enter into contracts related to prescribed burning operations. 

(B) A person qualified for the National Wildfire Coordinating Group position title of “Prescribed Fire Burn Boss Type 1” or “Prescribed Fire Burn Boss Type 2.”

(2) “Cultural burn” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 3333.8 of the Civil Code. 

(3) “Cultural fire practitioner” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 3333.8 of the Civil Code.

(4) “Fund” means the Prescribed Fire Claims Fund established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(5) “Program” means the Prescribed Fire Liability Pilot Program established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The Prescribed Fire Liability Pilot Program is hereby established, to be administered by the department, to increase the pace and scale of the use of prescribed fire and cultural burning and to reduce barriers for conducting prescribed fires and cultural burning. 

(c) (1) (A) The Prescribed Fire Claims Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury to
 support coverage for losses from prescribed fires and cultural burning by nonpublic entities, such as cultural fire practitioners, private landowners, and nongovernmental entities. The moneys in the fund shall be under the control of the department, and the department, or the third-party administrator with whom the department contracts pursuant to subdivision (d), is authorized to direct payments for claims from the fund, consistent with this section and the guidelines adopted by the department pursuant to subdivision (e).

(B) Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount in Item 3540-102-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chapter 240 of the Statutes of 2021) shall be transferred into the fund.

(C) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code or any other law, all moneys deposited or transferred into the fund, including pursuant to subparagraph (B), shall be
 continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for purposes of this section.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use moneys in the fund for cash flow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund and shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund.

(B) This paragraph does not authorize any transfer that would interfere with the department’s ability to carry out the purposes of this section.

(d) (1) The department may contract with any entity, including another state agency, to serve as a third-party
 administrator to administer or to assist in administering the fund, including, but not limited to, managing and operating the fund, adjusting claims made to the fund, and paying claims from the fund. Subject to prior written approval by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Section 1063.19 of the Insurance Code, the California Insurance Guarantee Association may serve as a third-party administrator of the fund. Participation by the California Insurance Guarantee Association shall be governed by the Insurance Commissioner’s authority over its Plan of Operation, pursuant to Article 14.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code.

(2) A third-party administrator with whom the department contracts pursuant to this subdivision, including the California Insurance Guarantee Association, is prohibited from settling or adjusting any claims to the fund while seeking to subrogate against the fund.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, advertising, competitive bidding, and protest requirements, and the requirement for Department of General Services approval, do not apply to a contract of no more than three years entered into by the department in the 2022–2023 fiscal year with a third-party administrator pursuant to this subdivision. However, subsequent contracts shall be awarded in accordance with applicable state laws and policies.

(B) In the event that a third-party administrator with whom the department contracts with pursuant to this subdivision, including the California Insurance Guarantee Association, is prohibited by law from settling or adjusting any claims to the fund as a result of seeking to subrogate against the fund, the department may award a contract to a new third-party administrator for the limited purpose of settling and adjusting those
 claims only and that contract shall not be subject to existing advertising, competitive bidding, and protest requirements, or the requirement for Department of General Services approval.

(e) The department shall collaborate with other relevant state agencies, cultural fire practitioners, and burn bosses to establish guidelines governing the program and the administration of the fund, including the payment of claims from the fund. The guidelines shall include, at a minimum, all of the following requirements:

(1) An eligible claim shall relate to either of the following:

(A) A prescribed fire conducted or supervised by a burn boss.

(B) A cultural burn conducted or supervised by a cultural fire practitioner.

(2) A claim shall not be paid from the fund unless, at a minimum, all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The department reviewed and approved a burn plan before the prescribed fire or cultural burning.

(B) A burn permit, if required, and all other permits required to conduct the prescribed fire or cultural burn were obtained.

(C) The department determines that the prescribed fire or cultural burn complied with, as applicable, the terms and conditions of all burn plans, burn permits, and other permits required to conduct the prescribed fire or cultural burn.

(3) The maximum amount the fund shall pay for losses arising from any one prescribed fire or cultural burn event is two million
 dollars ($2,000,000). For purposes of this paragraph, “losses arising from any one prescribed fire or cultural burn event” means all activities conducted pursuant to any one burn plan and, if required, burn permit.

(f) The department shall post the guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (e) on its internet website.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the state’s liability for all claims for covered losses established pursuant to this section and the guidelines developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be limited as described in this section and to the amount in the fund.

(h) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the guidelines developed by the department pursuant to
 subdivision (e) and used by the department or a third-party administrator with whom the department contracts pursuant to subdivision (d) to implement the program and to administer the fund.

(i) A person engaging with a Native American tribe, tribal organization, or cultural fire practitioner pursuant to this article shall respect tribal sovereignty, customs, and culture.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 606, Sec. 4.   (SB 926)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 4503.)
-------------------------------------------

4503.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 606, Sec. 5.   (SB 926)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 4.4, commencing with Section 4500.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Tribal Sovereignty with Respect to Cultural Burning [4505. - 4505.]

4505.

(a) (1) The Legislature acknowledges that federally recognized California Native American tribes have inherent sovereignty
 and authority to regulate their members and cultural practices, including, but not limited to, cultural fire practitioners and cultural burning.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that in order to meet fuel management and wildfire resilience goals of the state and to address the historical wrongs of criminalizing cultural use of fire, the state must work collaboratively with federally recognized California Native American tribes that engage in cultural burning within their ancestral territories.

(b) (1) The Secretary of the Natural Resources
 Agency, in consultation with its departments, commissions, boards, conservancies, and other entities, may enter into written agreements with federally recognized California Native American tribes in support of tribal sovereignty with respect to cultural burning in their ancestral territories. In deference to tribal sovereignty, the secretary may agree in a written agreement regarding cultural
 burning that compliance with either of the following is not required:

(A) The state permitting or regulatory requirements in Article 3 (commencing with Section 4491).

(B) The burn plan requirements in subdivision (e) of Section 4500.

(2) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall consult with federally recognized California Native American tribes on the implementation of paragraph (1).

(3) (A) Local air districts may enter into written agreements with federally recognized California Native American tribes in support of tribal sovereignty with respect to cultural burning in their ancestral territories.

(B) A local air district may agree in a written agreement regarding cultural burning that compliance with its permitting, regulatory, or administrative requirements is not required.

(C) In the event of a disagreement between a local air district and a tribe in developing or implementing an agreement, the Secretary for Environmental Protection shall assist in
 resolving the disagreement.

(4) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency or the local air district shall provide a copy of a final written agreement developed under this subdivision to the Deputy Secretary for Tribal Affairs at the Natural Resources Agency. In addition, a local air district shall provide a copy of a final written agreement developed under this subdivision to the State Air Resources Board.

(c) Nothing in this section provides authorization to enter or burn property without the permission of the landowner.

(d) Any state or local agency operating within a federally recognized California Native American tribe’s ancestral territory, including a local air district and a regional water quality control board, is highly encouraged to collaboratively work together with federally recognized California Native American tribes to create conditions that support cultural burning.

(e) A cultural burn conducted with an agreement developed under this section shall meet the permit requirements of Section 3333.8 of the Civil Code.

(f) This section does not grant immunity from fire suppression or other costs otherwise recoverable pursuant to Section 13009 or 13009.1 of the Health and Safety Code to any person whose conduct constitutes gross negligence.

(g) An agreement reached
 under this section shall include a clear description of the area covered by the agreement and an attestation that the area is within the boundaries of the tribe’s ancestral territory.

(h) This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 666, Sec. 4.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 4.5, commencing with Section 4505.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Z'berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 [4511. - 4630.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4511. - 4517.]

4511.

This chapter shall be known as the Z'berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

4512.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the forest resources and timberlands of the state are among the most valuable of the natural resources of the state and that there is great concern throughout the state relating to their utilization, restoration, and protection.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the forest resources and timberlands of the state furnish high-quality timber, recreational opportunities, and aesthetic enjoyment while providing watershed protection and maintaining fisheries and wildlife.

(c) The Legislature thus declares that it is the policy of this state to encourage
 prudent and responsible forest resource management calculated to serve the public’s need for timber and other forest products, while giving consideration to the public’s need for watershed protection, fisheries and wildlife, sequestration of carbon dioxide, and recreational opportunities alike in this and future generations.

(d) It is not the intent of the Legislature by the enactment of this chapter to take private property for public use without payment of just compensation in violation of the California and United States Constitutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 534, Sec. 1.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4512.5.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) State forests play a critical and unique role in the state’s carbon balance by sequestering carbon dioxide from the atmosphere and storing it long term as carbon.

(b) According to the scoping plan adopted by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), the state’s forests currently are an annual net sequester of five million metric tons of carbon dioxide (5MMTCO2). In fact, the forest sector is the only sector included in the scoping plan that provides a net sequestration of
 greenhouse gas emissions.

(c) The scoping plan proposes to maintain the current 5MMTCO2 annual sequestration rate through 2020 by implementing “sustainable management practices,” which include potential changes to existing forest practices and land use regulations.

(d) There is increasing evidence that climate change has and will continue to stress forest ecosystems, which underscores the importance of proactively managing forests so that they can adapt to these stressors and remain a net sequester of carbon dioxide.

(e) The board, the department, and the State Air Resources Board should strive to go beyond the status quo sequestration rate and ensure that their policies and regulations reflect the unique role forests play in combating climate change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 256.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4513.

It is the intent of the Legislature to create and maintain an effective and comprehensive system of regulation and use of all timberlands so as to ensure both of the following:

(a) Where feasible, the productivity of timberlands is restored, enhanced, and maintained.

(b) The goal of maximum sustained production of high-quality timber products is achieved while giving consideration to values relating to sequestration of carbon dioxide, recreation, watershed, wildlife, range and forage, fisheries, regional economic vitality, employment, and aesthetic enjoyment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 534, Sec. 3.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4514.

This chapter or a ruling, requirement, or policy of the board is not a limitation on the following:

(a) On the power of a city or county or city and county to declare, prohibit, and abate nuisances.

(b) On the power of the Attorney General, at the request of the board, or upon his or her own motion, to bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California to enjoin pollution or nuisance.

(c) On the power of a state agency in the enforcement or administration of the law that it is specifically authorized or required to enforce or administer.

(d) On the right of a person to maintain at any time an appropriate action for relief against a private nuisance as defined in Part 3 (commencing with Section 3479) of Division 4 of the Civil Code or for any other private relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4514.3.

(a) Timber operations conducted pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the waste discharge requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 13260) of Chapter 4 of Division 7 of the Water Code as long as both the federal Environmental Protection Agency and the State Water Resources Control Board certify after January 1, 2003, that the provisions of this chapter constitute best management practices for silviculture pursuant to Section 208 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act.

(b) The exemption contained in subdivision (a) does not apply when any of the following occurs:

(1) The board requests issuance of waste discharge requirements.

(2) There has been a finding by the State Water Resources Control Board that the board has failed to maintain a water quality regulatory process consistent with the certification required under subdivision (a).

(3) After monitoring the water quality impacts from timber operations conducted in compliance with this chapter, there has been a finding by the State Water Resources Control Board that compliance with best management practices would result in less water quality protection than required in water quality control plans approved pursuant to Section 13245 of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 900, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4514.5.

A person may commence an action on his or her own behalf against the board or the department for a writ of mandate pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure to compel the board or the department to carry out a duty imposed upon them pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 144.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4516.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the California Tahoe Regional Planning Agency shall have the right, within the reasonable exercise of its powers, to adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution which are stricter than those provided under this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. The agency’s rules and regulations may include, but are not limited to, matters relating to soil erosion control, protection of stream character and water quality, flood control, stand density control, reforestation methods, mass soil movements, submission of timber harvesting plans, location and grade of roads and skid trails, excavation and fill requirements, slash and debris disposal, haul routes and schedules, hours and dates of logging, and performance bond requirements.

Whenever state funds are not expended for the support of the California Tahoe Regional Planning Agency, as provided in Section 67131 of the Government Code, the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency shall have the right to adopt rules and regulations pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1561, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4516.5.

(a) Individual counties may recommend that the board adopt additional rules and regulations for the content of timber harvesting plans and the conduct of timber operations to take account of local needs. For purposes of this section, “timber operations” includes, but is not limited to, soil erosion control, protection of stream character and water quality, water distribution systems, flood control, stand density control, reforestation methods, mass soil movements, location and grade of roads and skid trails, excavation and fill requirements, slash and debris disposal, haul routes and schedules, hours and dates of logging, and performance bond or other reasonable surety requirements for onsite timber operations and for protection of publicly and privately owned roads that are part of the haul route. Where a bond or other surety has been required, the director shall not issue a work completion report without first ascertaining whether the county in which the timber operations were conducted has knowledge of any claims intended to be made on the bond or surety.

(b) The board shall, in conformance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and within 180 days after receiving recommended rules and regulations from a county, adopt rules and regulations for the content of timber harvesting plans and the conduct of timber operations consistent with the recommended rules and regulations, subject to Section 4551.5, if the board finds the recommended rules and regulations are both of the following:

(1) Consistent with the intent and purposes of this chapter.

(2) Necessary to protect needs and conditions of the county recommending them. 

(c) The rules and regulations, if adopted by the board, shall apply only to the conduct of timber operations within the recommending county and shall be enforced and implemented by the department in the same manner as other rules and regulations adopted by the board.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), individual counties shall not otherwise regulate the conduct of timber operations, as defined by this chapter, or require the issuance of any permit or license for those operations.

(e) The board may delegate to individual counties its authority to require performance bonds or other surety for the protection of roads, in which case, the procedures and forms shall be the same as those used in similar circumstances in the county. The board may establish reasonable limits on the amount of performance bonds or other surety which may be required for any timber operation and criteria for the requirement, payment, and release of those bonds or other surety. If the county fails to inform the director of the claims within 30 days after the completion report has been filed, the bond or surety shall be released.

(f) This section does not apply to timber operations on any land area of less than three acres and which is not zoned timberland production.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1446, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4516.6.

(a) To provide for adequate public review and comment, notwithstanding Section 4582.7, the director shall not approve a timber harvesting plan in any county for which rules and regulations have been adopted pursuant to Section 4516.5 or 4516.8 until 35 days from the date of filing of the plan, and timber operations shall not commence until five days from the date of approval of the plan. The board may provide, by regulation, for those periods to be waived or shortened by the department upon a determination, pursuant to criteria and procedures established by the board, that the proposed timber operations will cause no significant environmental damage or threat to public health and safety or to the environment, or that the timber operations are necessary to reduce that threat. If the chairperson of the board of supervisors of the county in which the proposed timber operations are located notifies the director and the plan submitter that the county intends to appeal the approval of the plan and that the county meets the requirements for filing an appeal, no timber operations shall occur until the final determination of the appeal. If the board of supervisors determines not to appeal the approval of the plan, it shall immediately notify the director and the plan submitter in writing of that determination, and timber operations pursuant to the plan may commence immediately.

(b) (1) The board of supervisors of the county for which rules and regulations have been adopted pursuant to Section 4516.5 or 4516.8 may, not later than 10 days after approval of the plan by the director, appeal that approval to the board, if the county has both participated in the initial inspection of the plan area with the director and participated in a multidisciplinary review of the plan.

(2) The board may establish procedures for filing the appeal and may specify findings that the board of supervisors is required to make in filing the appeal to demonstrate that a substantial issue is raised with respect to public health and safety or the environment.

(c) The board shall grant to a county that meets the requirements for filing an appeal an initial hearing to consider the county’s request for an appeal at the next regularly scheduled board meeting following the receipt of the request.

(d) The board shall grant a public hearing on the appeal if it determines at an initial hearing pursuant to subdivision (c) that the appeal raises substantial issues with respect to public health and safety or the environment.

(e) (1) The board shall hold a public hearing on the appeal granted pursuant to subdivision (d) within 30 days from the date of granting the hearing or at the next regularly scheduled board meeting, whichever occurs first, or within a longer period of time that is mutually agreed upon by the board, the county, and the plan submitter. Upon conclusion of the hearing, the board shall approve or deny the plan. The basis of the board’s decision shall be conformance with this section and the rules and regulations of the board, including any rules or regulations enacted with respect to the county pursuant to Section 4516.5 or 4516.8, and this chapter. In denying a plan, the board may make findings that set forth conditions under which it believes that the plan would have been approved.

(2) The board may delegate conduct of the hearing and the decision to a committee of three members to be appointed for that hearing by the chairperson of the board. The committee shall consist of at least two general public members of the board. The chairperson of the board or the chairperson’s designee shall conduct the hearing. The decision of the committee shall have the full force and effect of a decision of the full board.

(f) This section does not apply to timber operations on any land area of less than three acres and that is not zoned for timberland production.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 563.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4516.8.

In addition to the authority provided in Section 4516.5, the Counties of Marin, Monterey, San Mateo, Santa Clara, and Santa Cruz may recommend that the board adopt additional rules and regulations for the content of timber harvesting plans and the conduct of timber operations which provide a requirement that each timber harvesting plan contain a description of all log hauling routes, a statement of whether an encroachment permit is required by any public agency, and a requirement that no timber harvesting plan be approved by the director without the condition that the timber operator secure all required encroachment permits prior to commencement of timber operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1157, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4517.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [4521. - 4529.5.]

4521.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

4521.3.

“Board” means the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4523.

“District” means a forest district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

4524.

“License” means a license to engage in timber operations, issued pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 4571) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

4525.

“Person” includes any private individual, organization, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, city, county, district, or the state or any department or agency thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 209.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4525.3.

“Resource conservation standards” means the minimum acceptable condition resulting from timber operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

4525.5.

“Rules” means the district forest practice rules adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

4525.7.

“Slash” means branches or limbs less than four inches in diameter, and bark and split products debris left on the ground as a result of timber operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

4526.

“Timberland” means land, other than land owned by the federal government and land designated by the board as experimental forest land, which is available for, and capable of, growing a crop of trees of a commercial species used to produce lumber and other forest products, including Christmas trees. Commercial species shall be determined by the board on a district basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 584, Sec. 5.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4526.5.

“Timber operator” means a person who is engaged in timber operations or who contracts with others to conduct the operations on his or her behalf, except a person who is engaged in timber operations as an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 584, Sec. 6.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4527.

(a) (1) “Timber operations” means the cutting or removal, or both, of timber or other solid wood forest products, including Christmas trees, from timberlands for commercial purposes, together with all the incidental work, including, but not limited to, construction and maintenance of roads, fuelbreaks, firebreaks, stream crossings, landings, skid trails, and beds for the falling of trees, fire hazard abatement, and site preparation that involves disturbance of soil or burning of vegetation following timber harvesting activities, but excluding preparatory work such as treemarking, surveying, or roadflagging.

(2) “Commercial purposes” includes (A) the cutting or removal of trees that are processed into logs, lumber, or other wood products and
 offered for sale, barter, exchange, or trade, or (B) the cutting or removal of trees or other forest products during the conversion of timberlands to land uses other than the growing of timber that are subject to Section 4621, including, but not limited to, residential or commercial developments, production of other agricultural crops, recreational developments, ski developments, water development projects, and transportation projects.

(b) For purposes of this section, the removal of trees less than 16 inches in diameter at breast height from a firebreak or fuelbreak does not constitute “timber operations” if the removal meets all of the following criteria:

(1) It is located within 500 feet of the boundary of an urban wildland interface community at high risk of wildfire, as defined in pages 751 to 776, inclusive, of Volume 66 of the Federal Register (66 FR 751-02), as that
 definition may be amended from time to time. For purposes of this paragraph, “urban wildland interface community at high risk of wildfire” means an area having one or more structures for every five acres.

(2) It is part of a community wildfire protection plan approved by the department or part of a department fire plan.

(3) The trees to be removed will not be processed into logs or lumber, unless the work is being conducted by, or in partnership with, a public agency or a nonprofit organization that has received a grant from the department for vegetation management or fuel reduction, in which case the logs or lumber may be sold.

(4) The work to be conducted is under a firebreak or fuelbreak project that has been subject to a project-based review pursuant to a negative declaration, mitigated negative declaration, or
 environmental impact report in compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)). For projects to be conducted on forested landscapes, as defined in Section 754, the project and the project-based review shall be prepared by or in consultation with a registered professional forester.

(5) The removal of surface and ladder fuels is consistent with former paragraph (9) of subdivision (j) of Section 4584, as that section read on December 31, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 11.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4527.5.

“Timber owner” means a person who owns commercial timber, timberland, or timber rights, including Christmas tree rights, on lands of another except a federal agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 584, Sec. 8.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4528.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Basal area per acre” means the sum of the cross-sectional areas at breast height of the tree stems of commercial species per acre.

(b) “Countable tree” means a tree that can be used in calculating the degree of stocking under the following criteria:

(1) The tree must be in place at least two growing seasons.

(2) The tree must be live and healthy.

(3) The tree must have at least one-third of its length in live crown, except in pure stands of Douglas fir the tree must have at least one-fourth of its length in live crown.

(4) The tree must be a commercial species from a local seed source or a seed source which the registered professional forester determines will produce commercial trees physiologically suited for the area involved.

(c) “Stocking” means a measure of the degree to which space is occupied by well-distributed countable trees.

(d) “Site classification” means the classification of productive potential of timberland into one of five classes by board regulation, consistent with normally accepted forestry practices. Site I shall denote sites of highest productivity, site II and site III shall denote sites of intermediate productivity potential, and site IV and site V shall denote sites of lowest productivity potential. 

(e) “Fuel break” means a strip of modified fuel to provide a line from which to work in the control of fire.

(f) “Stream” means a natural watercourse as designated by a solid line or dash and three dots symbol shown on the largest scale United States Geological Survey map most recently published.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4528.5.

This chapter does not apply to a person who engages in activities regulated by this chapter, as an employee, with wages as his or her sole compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 584, Sec. 9.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4529.

The penalties and remedies which are prescribed in this chapter are concurrent and alternative to any other civil, criminal, or administrative rights, remedies, or penalties which are provided or allowed by law with respect to such violation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

4529.5.

Service of documents where required under this chapter may be made by registered or certified mail addressed to the respondent’s latest address registered on file with the department. Where other forms of service are prescribed, personal service is not precluded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Districts [4531. - 4531.]

4531.

The board shall divide the state into not less than three districts. In establishing these districts, the board shall take into account differing physical characteristics, including, but not limited to, climate, soil type, and principal forest crops. Insofar as possible, the board shall group together lands that have substantially similar characteristics and that will best be served by substantially similar regulations. Boundaries of such districts may be altered from time to time as the board determines is necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Rules and Regulations [4551. - 4555.]

4551.
